Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Taxation and Audit.

§ 59.1-392.
Percentage retained; tax.

Any person holding an operator’s license to operate a horse racetrack or satellite facility in the Commonwealth pursuant to this chapter shall be authorized to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing subject to the provisions of this chapter and
the conditions and regulations of the Commission.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage amount approved by the Commission as jointly requested by
a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid one and one-quarter percent to be distributed as follows: one percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax and one-quarter
percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located. The remainder of the retainage shall be paid as provided in subsection D, provided, however, that if the percentage amount approved by the Commission is other than 18 percent,
the amounts provided in subdivisions D 1, 2 and 3 shall be adjusted by the proportion that the approved percentage amount bears to 18 percent.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at each Virginia satellite facility on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage amount approved by the Commission as
jointly requested by a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid one and one-quarter percent to be distributed as follows: three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth
as a license tax, one-quarter percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located, and one-quarter percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located. The remainder of the retainage shall be paid as provided
in subsection D; provided, however, that if the percentage amount approved by the Commission is other than 18 percent, the amounts provided in subdivisions D 1, 2 and 3 shall be adjusted by the proportion that the approved percentage
amount bears to 18 percent.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack and each Virginia satellite facility on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage amount approved by
the Commission as jointly requested by a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid:

Eight percent as purses or prizes to the participants in such race meeting;

Seven and one-half percent, and all of the breakage and the proceeds of pari-mutuel tickets unredeemed 180 days from the date on which the race was conducted, to the operator;

One percent to the Virginia Breeders Fund;

Fifteen one-hundredths percent to the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Center Foundation;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Industry Board; and

The remainder of the retainage shall be paid as appropriate under subsection B or C.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage amount approved by the Commission as
jointly requested by a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid two and three-quarters percent to be distributed as follows: two and one-quarter percent to the
Commonwealth as a license tax, and one-half percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located. The remainder of the retainage shall be paid as provided in subsection G; provided, however, that if the percentage amount approved
by the Commission is other than 22 percent, the amounts provided in subdivisions G 1, 2 and 3 shall be adjusted by the proportion that the approved percentage amount bears to 22 percent.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at each Virginia satellite facility on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage amount approved by
the Commission as jointly requested by a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid two and three-quarters percent to be distributed as follows: one and three-quarters
percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax, one-half percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located, and one-half percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located. The remainder of the retainage shall
be paid as provided in subsection G; provided, however, that if the percentage amount approved by the Commission is other than 22 percent, the amounts provided in subdivisions G 1, 2 and 3 shall be adjusted by the proportion that
the approved percentage amount bears to 22 percent.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack and each Virginia satellite facility on live horse racing conducted within the Commonwealth involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain a percentage
amount approved by the Commission as jointly requested by a recognized majority horsemen’s group and a licensee and the legitimate breakage, out of which shall be paid:

Nine percent as purses or prizes to the participants in such race meeting;

Nine percent, and the proceeds of the pari-mutuel tickets unredeemed 180 days from the date on which the race was conducted, to the operator;

One percent to the Virginia Breeders Fund;

Fifteen one-hundredths percent to the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Center Foundation;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Industry Board; and

The remainder of the retainage shall be paid as appropriate under subsection E or F.

On pari-mutuel wagering generated by simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, the licensee may, with the approval of the Commission, commingle pools with the racetrack where the transmission emanates or establish
separate pools for wagering within the Commonwealth. All simulcast horse racing in this subsection must comply with the Interstate Horse Racing Act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.).

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain one and one-quarter percent of such pool to
be distributed as follows: three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax, and one-half percent to the Virginia locality in which the racetrack is located.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at each Virginia satellite facility on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain one and one-quarter percent
of such pool to be distributed as follows: three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax, one-quarter percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located, and one-quarter percent to the Virginia locality
in which the racetrack is located.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack and each Virginia satellite facility on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain one and
thirty one-hundredths percent of such pool to be distributed as follows:

One percent of the pool to the Virginia Breeders Fund;

Fifteen one-hundredths percent to the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Center Foundation;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Industry Board; and

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Thoroughbred Association for the promotion of breeding in the Commonwealth.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain two and three-quarters
percent of such pool to be distributed as follows: one and three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax, and one percent to the Virginia locality in which the racetrack is located.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at each Virginia satellite facility on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee shall retain two
and three-quarters percent of such pool to be distributed as follows: one and three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax, one-half percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located, and one-half
percent to the Virginia locality in which the racetrack is located.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering at the racetrack and each Virginia satellite facility on simulcast horse racing transmitted from jurisdictions outside the Commonwealth, involving wagering other than win, place and show wagering, the licensee
shall retain one and thirty one-hundredths percent of such pool to be distributed as follows:

One percent of the pool to the Virginia Breeders Fund;

Fifteen one-hundredths percent to the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Center Foundation;

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Horse Industry Board; and

Five one-hundredths percent to the Virginia Thoroughbred Association for the promotion of breeding in the Commonwealth.

Moneys payable to the Commonwealth shall be deposited in the general fund. Gross receipts for license tax purposes under Chapter 37 (§

58.1-3700

et seq.) of Title 58.1 shall not include pari-mutuel wagering pools and license taxes authorized by this section.

All payments by the licensee to the Commonwealth or any locality shall be made within five days from the date on which such wagers are received by the licensee. All payments by the licensee to the Virginia Breeders Fund shall be made to the Commission
within five days from the date on which such wagers are received by the licensee. All payments by the licensee to the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine, the Virginia Horse Center Foundation, the Virginia
Horse Industry Board, and the Virginia Thoroughbred Association shall be made by the first day of each quarter of the calendar year. All payments made under this section shall be used in support of the policy of the Commonwealth
to sustain and promote the growth of a native industry.

If a satellite facility is located in more than one locality, any amount a licensee is required to pay under this section to the locality in which the satellite facility is located shall be prorated in equal shares among those localities.

Any contractual agreement between a licensee and other entities concerning the distribution of the remaining portion of the retainage under subsections I through N and subsections u and V shall be subject to the approval of the Commission.

The recognized majority horsemen’s group racing at a licensed race meeting may, subject to the approval of the Commission, withdraw for administrative costs associated with serving the interests of the horsemen an amount not to exceed two percent of the
amount in the horsemen’s account.

The legitimate breakage from each pari-mutuel pool for live, historical, and simulcast horse racing shall be distributed as follows:

Seventy percent to be retained by the licensee to be used for capital improvements that are subject to approval of the Commission; and

Thirty percent to be deposited in the Racing Benevolence Fund, administered jointly by the licensee and the recognized majority horsemen’s group racing at a licensed race meeting, to be disbursed with the approval of the Commission for gambling addiction
and substance abuse counseling, recreational, educational or other related programs.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering on historical horse racing on the first 3,000 terminals authorized, the licensee shall retain 1.25 percent of such pool to be distributed as follows:

Seventy-four hundredths percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax and 0.01 percent to the Problem Gambling Treatment and Support Fund established pursuant to §

37.2-314.2

; and

If generated at a racetrack, 0.5 percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located; or

If generated at a satellite facility, 0.25 percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located and 0.25 percent to the Virginia locality in which the racetrack is located.

On pari-mutuel pools generated by wagering on historical racing on the 2,000 terminals authorized by the seventh enactment of Chapters 1197 and 1248 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020, the licensee shall retain 1.6 percent of such pool to be distributed
as follows:

Ninety-five hundredths percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax and 0.01 percent to the Problem Gambling Treatment and Support Fund established pursuant to §

37.2-314.2

; and

If generated at a racetrack, 0.64 percent to the locality in which the racetrack is located; or

If generated at a satellite facility, 0.32 percent to the locality in which the satellite facility is located and 0.32 percent to the Virginia locality in which the racetrack is located.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1991, c. 591; 1992, c. 820; 1995, c. 217; 1998, cc. 608, 619; 2000, c. 1031; 2007, c. 61; 2011, c. 732; 2015, cc. 731, 751; 2018, c. 811; 2022, c. 511.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 732, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Racing Commission shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2018, c. 811, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Racing Commission shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 180 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 110 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of § 59.1-392, Code of Virginia, up to $255,000 the first year and $255,000 the second
year shall be transferred to Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University to support the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1031, effective April 19, 2000, deleted “and all the breakage” following “Nine percent” in subdivision G 2, and added subdivisions S and T.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 61 substituted “Virginia Horse Center Foundation” for “Virginia Equine Center Foundation” in subdivisions D 5, G 5, K 3 and N 3 and in the third sentence of subsection P.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 732, in subsection B and C, substituted “a percentage amount approved by the Commission as jointly requested by a recognized majority horseman’s group and an unlimited licensee” for “an amount not to exceed eighteen percent of
such pool” and added a proviso at the end; in subsection A, deleted “eighteen percent” following “The remainder of the” in the second sentence; in subsection D, substituted “a percentage amount approved by the Commission as jointly
requested by a recognized majority horseman’s group and an unlimited licensee” for “an amount not to exceed eighteen percent of such pool”; in subdivision D 7, deleted “eighteen percent” preceding ”retainage shall be paid as appropriate”;
in subsections E, F, and G, substituted “a percentage amount approved by the Commission as jointly requested by a recognized majority horseman’s group and an unlimited licensee” for “an amount not to exceed twenty-two percent of such
pool”; in subsections E and F, added a proviso at the end; added subdivisions K 5 and N 5; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 731 and 751 are identical, and substituted “majority horsemen’s group and a licensee” for “majority horseman’s group and an unlimited licensee” throughout; and in subsection S and subdivision T 2, substituted “The recognized
majority horsemen’s group racing at a licensed race” for “The horsemen’s organizations representing a majority of the horsemen racing at a licensed unlimited race.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 811, in subsection R, inserted “and subsection U”; in subsection T, substituted “live, historical, and simulcast horse racing” for “both live racing and simulcast horse racing” in the opening paragraph; and added subsection U.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 511, substituted “subsections U and V” for “subsection U” in subsection R; in subsection U, inserted “on the first 3,000 terminals authorized” and substituted “retain 1.25 percent” for “retain one and one-quarter percent”; rewrote
subdivision U 1, which read: “Three-quarters percent to the Commonwealth as a license tax; and”; substituted “0.5 percent” for “one-half percent” in subdivision U 2 a; substituted “0.25 percent” for “one-quarter percent” twice in subdivision
U 2 b; and added subsection V.

§ 59.1-392.1.
Advance deposit account wagering revenues; distribution.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 59.1-392, the allocation of revenue from advance deposit account wagering shall include (i) a licensee fee of 1.5 percent paid to the Commission; (ii) an additional fee equal to one percent of all wagers made within
the Commonwealth placed through an advance deposit account wagering licensee, which shall be paid to the Virginia Breeders Fund, and (iii) an additional fee equal to nine percent of all wagers made within the Commonwealth placed
through an advance deposit account wagering licensee, out of which shall be paid:

Four percent to a nonprofit industry stakeholder organization recognized by, and with oversight from, the Commission to include the recognized majority horsemen’s group, a breeder’s organization, and a licensed track operator for the purpose of promoting,
sustaining, and advancing horse racing within the Commonwealth; and

Five percent to representatives of the recognized majority horsemen’s group by breed to be used for purse funds at races conducted in the Commonwealth, unless otherwise authorized by the Commission.Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the advance deposit
account wagering licensee is a significant infrastructure limited licensee, the additional fee equal to nine percent of the wagers placed through such advance deposit account wagering licensee since November 1, 2014, shall
instead be retained by such licensee for operational expenses, including defraying the costs of live racing.

The Commission-recognized nonprofit industry stakeholder organization shall make distributions from fees received from advance deposit wagering to organizations within the Commonwealth providing care for retired race horses, the Virginia-Maryland Regional
College of Veterinary Medicine, the Virginia Horse Center Foundation, the Virginia Horse Industry Board, and the Virginia Thoroughbred Association in the percentages of wagering handles set forth in subsections K and N of § 59.1-392,
and shall make a distribution of thirty-five one-hundredths of one percent of all wagers made within the Commonwealth placed through such advance deposit account wagering licensee to the locality where live racing licensed by the
Commission occurred prior to January 1, 2012, and beginning January 1, 2020, to the locality or localities where such live racing occurs to be shared in a ratio of the number of such annual live races in a locality to the total
number of such annual lives races in the Commonwealth. Distributions under this section from the Commission-recognized nonprofit stakeholder organization to the foregoing entities and locality or localities, when added to the distributions
to such entities and locality or localities under § 59-1.392, shall be capped at the sum necessary to equal distributions made in the 2013 calendar year to each entity under § 59-1.392, and shall be capped at the sum necessary
to equal $400,000 for a locality or localities.

Any additional distribution of fees received from advance deposit account licensees by the Commission-recognized nonprofit industry stakeholder organization shall be approved by the Commission.

History.
2015, cc. 731, 751.

§ 59.1-393.
Admissions tax.

The governing body of any county or city may by ordinance impose a tax on any licensee hereunder to conduct a race meeting at a track located solely in such county or city of twenty-five cents on the admission of each person on each day except those holding
a valid permit under this chapter and actually employed at such track in the capacity for which such permit was issued. The licensee may collect such amount from the ticket holder in addition to the amount charged for the ticket of
admission.

If such track or its enclosure is located in two or in three localities, each locality may impose a tax hereunder of twelve and one-half cents or eight and one-third cents per person, respectively.

Gross receipts for license tax purposes under Chapter 37 of Title 58.1 shall not include the admissions tax imposed under this section.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1991, c. 591.

§ 59.1-394.
Audit required.

A regular post-audit shall be conducted of all accounts and transactions of the Commission. An audit of a fiscal and compliance nature of the accounts and transactions of the Commission shall be conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts as determined
necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The cost of the audit and post-audit examinations shall be borne by the Commission.

History.
1988, c. 855; 2018, cc. 57, 307.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 57 and 307 are identical, and in the second and third sentences, deleted “annual” preceding “audit” and in the second sentence, substituted “as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts” for “on or before September
30 of each year.”